California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(b) Any individual convicted under Section 2101 by any court of competent jurisdiction of willfully making a false statement or knowingly failing to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or payment under this part, Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501), or Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001) shall, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the individual to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty or dismissing the criminal complaint, be ineligible to receive unemployment compensation or extended duration benefits or federal-state extended benefits for the week in which the criminal complaint was filed, or any subsequent week, for which he or she is first otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation or extended duration benefits or federal-state extended benefits and for 14 subsequent weeks for which he or she is otherwise in all respects eligible for unemployment compensation or extended duration benefits or federal-state extended benefits. No disqualification under this subdivision shall be applied to any week if all or any portion of the week is beyond the three-year period next succeeding the date of the filing of the criminal complaint. 

(c) The department shall, effective upon the date of the filing of a criminal complaint against an individual prosecuted under Section 2101, suspend the payment of benefits to the individual. 

(d) A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section irrespective of whether an order granting probation or other order is made suspending the imposition of the sentence or whether sentence is imposed but execution thereof is suspended. 

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an individual may during a period of forfeiture under subdivision (a) of this section meet the conditions to remove any disqualification that is imposed under Sections 1260 or 1261, or subdivision (b) of this section, but no week during the period of forfeiture shall be used to offset the amount of any overpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1264.

(a) (1) Unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and federal-state extended benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, unless that person is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing the services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, including a person who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of Section 203(a)(7) or Section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), and only to the extent authorized by federal law, a person who (A) is the subject of a notice of decision from the federal government granting deferred action under the federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program announced by the United States Secretary of Homeland Security on June 15, 2012, and (B) performed the services while in receipt of a valid employment authorization from the federal government, is a person who was lawfully present for purposes of performing those services.

(b) Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits specified by subdivision (a) to determine whether these benefits are not payable to them because of their federal immigration status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for
 these benefits.

(c) In the case of an individual whose application for benefits specified by subdivision (a) would otherwise be approved, no determination by the department, an administrative law judge, or the appeals board that these benefits to the individual are not payable because of the individual’s federal immigration status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

(d) If a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States presents evidence that the Immigration and Naturalization Service has granted the person employment authorization as a result of an application for temporary residence status under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603), pending a final determination on this application the department shall
 not do either of the following:

(1) Commence or continue to pursue any administrative or judicial action to collect benefits where there has been a final determination that these benefits have been overpaid or chargeable
 to the person, because of the person’s immigration status at the time they performed the services compensated by their base period wages.

(2) Determine that the person was overpaid benefits in the current benefit year or in any prior benefit year, if the basis for the determination is the assumption that because the person is an applicant for temporary resident status they were not, while performing the services compensated by base period wages, lawfully admitted for permanent residence, lawfully present for purposes of performing the services that were compensated by their base period wages, or permanently residing in the United States under color of law.

(e) If the Immigration and Naturalization Service grants the application and adjusts the person’s status
 to that of lawful temporary resident, the department shall not take any action described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or make any determination described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). If a person is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence, lawfully present for the purpose of performing the services compensated by their base period wages, or permanently residing in the United States under color of law, at the time the person’s lawful temporary permanent status terminates, then compensation shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by the person after the termination.

(f) Nothing in subdivision (d) shall be construed to require the department to do any of the following:

(1) Repay any amounts collected under any present or past action as
 described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(2) Redetermine the eligibility for unemployment compensation benefits of any person who the department originally determined
 to be ineligible because of the person’s federal immigration status at the time they performed the services compensated by their base period wages and with respect to whom the determination has become final.

(3) Apply subdivision (d) or (e) retroactively.

(g) If the United States Secretary of Labor finds that subdivisions (d) and (e) are not in conformity with the federal Unemployment Tax Act, and effective as of the date that this finding becomes final, subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be inoperative and of no legal force or effect.

(h) Unless subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) have earlier become inoperative and of no legal force or effect pursuant to a finding by the Secretary of Labor under
 subdivision (g), subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g) shall remain in effect only until September 30, 1990, and as of that date shall become inoperative, unless a later enacted statute which is chaptered before September 30, 1990, deletes or extends that date. Notwithstanding this subdivision, however, the department shall not take any action to collect benefits from an individual when the collection against that individual was suspended pursuant to subdivision (e) prior to September 30, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 59.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, payments to an individual under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provisions for his employees generally, or for a class or group of his employees, for the purpose of supplementing unemployment compensation benefits shall not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division and benefits payable under this division shall not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of payments under such arrangements or plans.

This amendment is hereby declared to be merely a clarification of the original intention of the Legislature and is not a substantive change, and is in conformity with the existing administrative interpretation of the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, payments to an individual by an employer who has failed to provide the advance notice of facility closure required by the federal Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification (WARN) Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code may not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division.

(b) Benefits payable under this division may not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of payments related in any way to an employer’s violation of the WARN Act or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, payments to an individual for vacation pay which was earned but not paid for services performed prior to termination of employment shall not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division and benefits payable under this division shall not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of these payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1134, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, payments to an individual for holiday pay for any holiday occurring in a week during which the individual was unemployed shall be deemed wages received for the week in which the individual returns to work, if holiday pay is not paid until the individual returns to work from a definite period of layoff. Payments to an individual for holiday pay for any holiday occurring in a week during which the individual was unemployed shall be deemed wages received for the week in which the holiday falls, if holiday pay is paid prior to the individual’s return to work from a definite period of layoff.

However, payments to an individual for holiday pay which was earned but not paid prior to an indefinite layoff, or termination of employment, or commencement of unemployment caused by disability, as the case may be, shall not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division and benefits payable under this division shall not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of these payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 929, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, payments to an individual for sick pay which was earned but not paid for services performed prior to termination of employment, shall not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division and benefits payable under this division shall not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of such payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

1265.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, payments for severance pay or terminal pay to an individual who is terminated from his or her employment as a direct result of the expansion of a federal redwood park in northern California by reason of legislation enacted by Congress in 1977 or 1978, shall not be construed to be wages or compensation for personal services under this division, and benefits payable under this division shall not be denied or reduced because of the receipt of such payment.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1265.7 (as added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1156) by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5.  California Training Benefits Program [1266. - 1274.20.]

1266.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Training Benefits Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1266.1.

Experience has shown that the ability of a large number of the population of California to compete for jobs in the labor market is impaired by advancement in technological improvements, the widespread effects of automation and relocation in our economy, and foreign competition as set forth in petitions certified under the federal Trade Act of 1974, as amended (Title 19, United States Code, Sections 2101 et seq.). The Legislature finds that many individuals in California are lacking in skills that would make them competitive in the labor market. They are in need of training or retraining to upgrade their skills required in demand occupations. It is the policy of this state to assist these individuals by providing unemployment compensation benefits, extended duration benefits, and other
 federally funded unemployment compensation benefits, including those available under the federal Trade Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-618), as amended by the federal Trade Act of 2002 (Public Law 107-210), during a period of retraining to qualify them for jobs in demand occupations and thus avoid long-term unemployment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1267.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, with respect to an unemployed individual otherwise eligible for benefits, those benefits shall not be denied to an individual for any week because he or she is in eligible training or retraining, as described in Section 1269 or 1269.1, or because of the application to any such week in training or retraining of any law of this state relating to availability for work, active search for work, refusal to accept work, or for leaving his or her most recent work, if continuing the most recent work would require the individual to terminate his or her training or retraining course of instruction. The individual is considered to be in training or retraining during regularly scheduled vacation or recess periods, such as
 Christmas and Thanksgiving holidays, or semester breaks, but not during a summer vacation period. As used in this article, “individual” includes an exhaustee as defined in Section 3503, and any individual claiming federal-state extended benefits under Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001), and anyone receiving federally funded unemployment compensation benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 4.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1268.

An unemployed individual who files a claim for unemployment compensation benefits or extended duration benefits, or an application for federal-state extended benefits or any federally funded unemployment compensation benefits, may apply to the department for a determination of potential eligibility for benefits during a period of training or retraining.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1274.2 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1211, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1269.

A determination of automatic eligibility for benefits under this article shall be issued to an unemployed individual if the director finds that any of the following applies:

(a) The training is authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) or by the Employment Training Panel established pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 1 of Division 3.

(b) The training is authorized by the federal Trade Act of 1974 (19
 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.), as amended, pursuant to a certified petition.

(c) The individual is a participant in the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and has entered into a contract with the county welfare department to participate in an education or training program.

(d) (1) The individual is a participant in training with a provider that is certified and on the state’s Eligible Training Provider List (ETPL), as authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), or the individual is a permanent or probationary public school teacher who is a participant in a credential preparation program or training program approved or accredited by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for additional certification in math, science, or special education, for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and was laid off. The credential preparation program or training program shall only be approved if a permanent or probationary public school teacher enrolls in the training within three years of being laid off from the public school employer.

(2) The changes made to this subdivision by
 Chapter 278 of the Statutes of 2012, shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(e) The individual is a journey level member of a union or trade association, or is a participant in training sponsored by an employer, and the training or retraining course of instruction is industry-related training necessary due to changes in technology, or industry demands, or is necessary to retain employment or to become more competitive in obtaining employment, or the individual is a participant in a state or federally approved apprenticeship
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1269.1.

If the training is not authorized under Section 1269, a determination of potential eligibility for benefits under this article shall be issued to an unemployed individual if the director finds that all of the following apply:

(a) The individual has been unemployed for four or more continuous weeks, or the individual is unemployed and unlikely to return to his or her most recent workplace because work opportunities in the individual’s job classification are impaired by a plant closure or a substantial reduction in employment at the individual’s most recent workplace, by advancement in technological improvements, by the effects of automation and relocation in the economy, or because of mental or physical disability that
 prohibits the individual from utilizing existing occupational skills.

(b) One of the substantial causes of the individual’s unemployment is a lack of sufficient current demand in the individual’s labor market area for the occupational skills for which the individual is fitted by training and experience or current physical or mental capacity, and that the lack of employment opportunities is expected to continue for an extended period of time, or, if the individual’s occupation is one for which there is a seasonal variation in demand in the labor market and the individual has no other skill for which there is current demand.

(c) The training or retraining course of instruction relates to an occupation or skill for which there are, or are expected to be in the immediate future, reasonable employment opportunities in the labor market area in this state in which the individual intends
 to seek work and there is not a substantial surplus of workers with requisite skills in the occupation in that area.

(d) The training or retraining course of instruction is one approved by the director and can be completed within a reasonable period of time.

(e) The training or retraining course is a full-time course prescribed for the primary purpose of training the applicant in skills that will allow him or her to obtain employment in a demand occupation.

(f) The individual can be reasonably expected to complete the training or retraining successfully.

(g) The beginning date of training is more than three years after the beginning date of training last approved for the individual under this subdivision.

(h) (1) If a determination of potential eligibility for benefits is issued under this section, except under subdivision (c), and when federal extended unemployment insurance benefits are in effect, the director may find that an unemployed individual is eligible for training benefits if the individual is enrolled in a community college or other accredited postsecondary education program with the purpose of preparing the applicant in academic or job skills, including remedial training, that will increase employment opportunities or that leads to an industry-recognized credential or certificate designed for a specific occupation. If an individual is approved for training benefits under this subdivision and the federal extended unemployment insurance benefits are subsequently no longer in effect, the individual shall remain eligible as long as he or she is attending the training and is meeting the provisions of this article.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Accredited” means an institution recognized or approved by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(B) “Accrediting agency” is an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 6.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1270.

As used in this article:

(a) “Demand occupation” means an occupation in a labor market area in which the director determines work opportunities are available and there is not a surplus of qualified applicants.

(b) “Labor market area” means a county, or aggregation of counties designated by the department that meets criteria of population, population density, commute patterns, and social and economic integration specified by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.

(a) Any unemployed individual receiving unemployment compensation benefits payable under this division, who applies for a determination of potential eligibility for benefits under this article no later than the 16th week of his or her receiving these benefits, and is determined eligible for benefits under this article, is entitled to a training extension on his or her unemployment compensation claim, if necessary, to complete approved training.

(b) The training extension shall provide the claimant with a maximum of 52 times the weekly benefit of the
 parent unemployment compensation claim, which shall
 be reduced by all of the following:

(1) The maximum benefit award on the parent unemployment compensation claim.

(2) Benefits payable during the period of approved training on any other unemployment compensation claim filed pursuant to this chapter, to the extent permitted by law.

(3) Benefits payable during the period of approved training under any state or federal unemployment compensation law, to the extent permitted by state or federal law, including, but not limited to, all of
 the following:

(A) Extended unemployment compensation benefits payable under Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501).

(B) Federal-state extended compensation benefits payable under Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001).

(C) Trade readjustment allowance benefits payable under the federal Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. Sec. 2101 et seq.), as amended.

(c) The parent unemployment compensation claim shall be the unemployment compensation claim in existence at the time the claimant is determined eligible for benefits pursuant
 to subdivision (a).

(d) Benefits payable under this section are subject to the following limitations:

(1) The individual shall remain eligible for benefits under this article for all weeks potentially payable under this section.

(2) The individual shall file any unemployment compensation claim to which he or she becomes entitled under state or federal law, and shall draw any unemployment compensation benefits on that claim until it has expired or has been exhausted, in order to maintain his or her eligibility under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1271.5.

(a) The department shall inform all individuals who claim unemployment compensation benefits in this state of the benefits potentially available under this article and Section 1271. The department shall convey this information verbally, in written form, or online. If in written form, the department may utilize publications or handbooks that inform individuals of their rights and duties in regard to unemployment compensation benefits. These publications, issued by the department pursuant to authorized regulations, may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section. Information required by this section shall be made available on the department’s Internet Web site in close proximity to information on unemployment compensation claim forms.

(b) Benefits paid under Section 1271 shall be charged to individual employer reserve accounts, consistent with the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 7.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1253, an unemployed individual who is able to work is eligible to receive benefits under this article with respect to any week during a period of training or retraining only if the director finds both of the following:

(a) He or she has been determined potentially eligible under Section 1269, 1269.1, or 1271.

(b) He or she submits a certification, as prescribed by the Employment Development Department through
 regulations,
 certifying that he or she is enrolled in and satisfactorily pursuing the training or retraining course of instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 224, Sec. 3.   (AB 1514)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1272.5.

If an individual fails to submit for any week during a period of training or retraining the certification required by Section 1272, he or she shall be ineligible to receive any benefits for that week. This section shall not render an individual ineligible for benefits for any week during the period of training or retraining if on or before Monday of that week he or she notifies the department that his or her training or retraining course of instruction has been or is being discontinued or terminated prior to that week.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1274.7 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1211, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.

The director may publish a list of high demand occupations in each labor market area of this state. If a demand occupation is limited to a particular industry, the director may identify the industry of the demand occupation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1274.5 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 956, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.5.

Not later than September 1, 2016, the department shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report evaluating the effectiveness of the California Training Benefits Program required to be implemented pursuant to this article. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following data for calendar years 2007 through 2014, inclusive:

(a) The number of individuals determined to be eligible for the program as of December 31, 2015.

(b) The number of individuals determined to be eligible for the program under each subdivision of Section 1269.

(c) The
 number of individuals determined to be eligible for the program under Section 1269.1.

(d) The number of individuals who participated in the program and earned subsequent wages in the following calendar year.

(e) Recommendations to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 9.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative on date (no later than July 1, 2011) prescribed in Section 1274.20.)
-------------------------------------------

1274.20.

The amendments to this article proposed by Assembly Bill 2058 of the 2009–10 Regular Session shall be effective commencing January 1, 2011, unless the department determines that implementation by that date is not feasible, in which case the department shall implement the amendments provided by that measure no later than July 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 591, Sec. 10.   (AB 2058)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computation (Amount and Duration) [1275. - 1282.]

1275.

(a) Unemployment compensation benefit award computations shall be based on wages paid in the base period. “Base period” means: for benefit years beginning in October, November, or December, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of June; for benefit years beginning in January, February, or March, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of September; for benefit years beginning in April, May, or June, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of December; for benefit years beginning in July, August, or September, the four calendar quarters ended with the next preceding month of March. Wages used in the determination of benefits payable to an individual during any benefit year may not be used in determining that individual’s
 benefits in any subsequent benefit year.

(b) For any new claim filed on or after April 2, 2012, or earlier if the department implements the technical changes necessary to establish claims under the alternate base period, as specified in subdivision (c), if an individual cannot establish a claim under subdivision (a), then “base period” means: for benefit years beginning in October, November, or December, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of September; for benefit years beginning in January, February, or March, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of December; for benefit years beginning in April, May, or June, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of March; for benefit years beginning in July, August, or September, the four calendar quarters ended in the next preceding month of June. As provided in Section 1280, the quarter with the highest wages shall be used to
 determine the individual’s weekly benefit amount. Wages used in the determination of benefits payable to an individual during any benefit year may not be used in determining that individual’s benefits in any subsequent benefit year.

(c) The department shall implement the technical changes necessary to establish claims under the alternate base period specified in subdivision (b) as soon as possible, but no later than April 2, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 31, Sec. 15.   (AB 119)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1276.

“Benefit year”, with respect to any individual, means the 52-week period beginning with the first day of the week with respect to which the individual first files a valid claim for benefits and thereafter the 52-week period beginning with the week in which such individual again files a valid claim after the termination of his or her last preceding benefit year. As used in this section, “valid claim” means any claim for benefits made in accordance with this division and authorized regulations if the individual filing the claim is unemployed and has met the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1281. For the purpose of determining whether a claim is a “valid claim” within
 the meaning of this section, an individual otherwise unemployed shall be deemed unemployed even though wages, as defined in Section 1252, which are for a period subsequent to the termination of performance of services are payable with respect to the week for which he or she files the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.

Notwithstanding Section 1281, if the base period of a new claim includes wages which were paid prior to the effective date of, and not used in the computation of the award for, a previous valid claim, the new claim shall only be valid if, during the 52-week period beginning with the effective date of the previous valid claim, either of the following applies:

(a) The individual earned or was paid sufficient wages to meet the eligibility requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1281 and performed some work.

(b) The individual did
 not receive benefits under this part, and was disabled and was entitled to receive, wage loss benefits under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division or under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code, or under any workers’ compensation law, employer’s liability law, or disability insurance law of any other state or of the federal government.

For the purpose of this section only, the term “wages” includes any and all compensation for personal services performed as an employee for the purpose of meeting the eligibility requirements under subdivision (a) of Section 1281. This section is not applicable to the computation of an award for disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1277, if an individual has a subsequent new claim and the previous valid claim was filed under subdivision (b) of Section 1275, the new claim shall only be valid if, during the 52-week period beginning with the effective date of the previous claim, either of the following applies:

(1) The individual earned or was paid sufficient wages to meet eligibility requirements of
 subdivision (a) of Section 1281 and performed some work.

(2) The individual did not receive benefits under this part and was disabled and was entitled to receive wage loss benefits under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) or under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, under any workers’ compensation law, under employer’s liability law, or under any disability insurance law of any other state or the federal government.

(b) For purposes of this section, “wages” includes any and all compensation for personal services performed as an employee for the purpose of meeting the eligibility requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1281. This subdivision is not applicable to the computation of an award for disability benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 23, Sec. 3.   (AB 29 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1277.5.

In determining, under Sections 1277 and 1277.1, whether a new claim is valid, twice the amount that an individual was entitled to receive under Part 2 (commencing with Section 2601) of this division or under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code, or under any workers’ compensation law, employer’s liability law, or disability insurance law of any other state or of the federal government, during the 52-week
 period beginning with the effective date of the previous valid claim, shall be considered as wages earned or paid to the individual during that 52-week period for purposes of meeting the eligibility requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1281. The amounts so included shall not be considered wages for the purpose of computing the weekly benefit amount of the individual under Section 1280 or the maximum amount payable to the individual under Section 1281.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 23, Sec. 4.   (AB 29 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1278.

For the purposes of this chapter, wages shall be counted as “wages for employment for employers” for benefit purposes with respect to any benefit year only if the benefit year begins subsequent to the date on which the employer from whom the wages were earned has satisfied the conditions of this division with respect to being an employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1279.

(a) Each individual eligible under this chapter who is unemployed in any week shall be paid with respect to that week an unemployment compensation benefit in an amount equal to his or her weekly benefit amount less the smaller of the following:

(1) The amount of wages in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25) payable to him or her for services rendered during that week.

(2) The amount of wages in excess of 25 percent of the amount of wages payable to him or her for services rendered during that week.

(b) The benefit payment, if not a multiple of one dollar ($1), shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(c) For the purpose of this section only “wages” includes any and all compensation for personal services whether performed as an employee or as an independent contractor or as a juror or as a witness, but does not include any payments, regardless of their designation, made by a city of this state to an elected official thereof as an incident to public office, nor any payment received by a member of the National Guard or reserve component of the armed forces for inactive duty training, annual training, or emergency state active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 761, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1279.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1252 or 1252.2 or any other provision of this part, for the purposes of this section an individual is “unemployed” in any week if the individual works less than his or her normal weekly hours of work for the individual’s regular employer, and the director finds that the regular employer has reduced or restricted the individual’s normal hours of work, or has rehired an individual previously laid off and reduced that individual’s normal hours of work from those previously worked, as the result of a plan by the regular employer to, in lieu of layoff, reduce employment and stabilize the work force by a program of sharing the work remaining after a reduction in total hours of work and a corresponding reduction in wages of at least 10 percent. The application for